Massachusetts, session 194th, S1339.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 1 of chapter 175M of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking the definition of “Covered individual” and inserting the following:-
''Covered individual'', either: (i) an employee who meets the financial eligibility
requirements of subsection (a) of section 24 of chapter 151A; provided, however, that all such
employment shall have been with an employer in the commonwealth; (ii) a personal care
attendant, as defined in section 70 of chapter 118E, whose wages from working as a personal
care attendant meet the financial eligibility requirements of said subsection (a) of said section 24
of said chapter 151A; (iii) a family child care provider, as defined in subsection (a) of section 17
of chapter 15D, whose payments from working as a family child care provider meet the financial
eligibility requirements of said subsection (a) of said section 24 of said chapter 151A; (iv) a self-
employed individual: (A) who has elected coverage under subsection (j) of section 2; and (B)
whose reported earnings to the department of revenue from self-employment meet the financial
of 4

eligibility requirements of said subsection (a) of said section 24 of said chapter 151A as if the
individual were an employee; (v) a covered contract worker: (A) for whom at least 1 employer or
covered business entity is required to remit contributions to the Family and Employment
Security Trust Fund pursuant to section 6; and (B) whose payments from such employer or
covered business entity satisfy the financial eligibility requirements of said subsection (a) of said
section 24 of said chapter 151A as if the covered contract worker were an employee; (vi) an
employee of a school district as defined in section 2 of chapter 70 or an education collaborative
as established under section 4E of chapter 40; or (vii) a former employee who has: (A) met the
financial eligibility requirements of said subsection (a) of said section 24 of said chapter 151A at
the time of the former employee's separation from employment; provided, however, that all such
employment shall have been with an employer in the commonwealth; and (B) been separated
from employment for not more than 26 weeks at the start of the former employee's family or
medical leave.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of said chapter 175M is hereby amended by striking the definition
of “Employer” and inserting the following:-
''Employer'', shall have the same meaning as provided in subsection (i) of section 1 of
chapter 151A; provided, however, that an individual employer shall be determined by the
Federal Employer Identification Number; provided further, that, notwithstanding any general or
special law to the contrary, the PCA quality home care workforce council established in section
71 of chapter 118E shall be the employer of personal care attendants, as defined in section 70 of
said chapter 118E, solely for the purposes of section 6 and consumers, as defined in said section
70 of said chapter 118E, shall be considered the employers of personal care attendants solely for
the purposes of the notice requirements set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of section 4 and
of 4

subsection (d) of section 8; provided further, that, notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, the department of early education and care shall be the employer of family child
care providers, as defined in subsection (a) of section 17 of chapter 15D, solely for the purposes
of section 6 and the notice provisions set forth in subsections (a) and (b) of section 4 and
subsection (d) of section 8; provided further, that, notwithstanding any general or special law to
the contrary, a school district as defined in section 2 of chapter 70 or an education collaborative
as established under section 4E of chapter 40 shall be considered a covered employer and shall
not be subject to section 10 of this chapter; provided further, that any employer not subject to this
chapter may become a covered employer under this chapter by notifying the department of
family and medical leave and completing the procedure established by the department; and
provided further, that a municipality, district, political subdivision or its instrumentalities shall
not be subject to this chapter unless it adopts this chapter under section 10.
SECTION 2. Section 2 of said chapter 175M is hereby amended by striking out
subsection (f) and inserting in place thereof the following subsection:-
(f) Notwithstanding subsection (e) or any other general or special law to the contrary, the
taking of family or medical leave shall not affect an employee's right to accrue vacation time,
sick leave, bonuses, advancement, seniority, length-of-service credit, creditable service as
defined in section 1 of chapter 32, or other employment benefits, plans or programs. During the
duration of an employee's family or medical leave, the employer shall provide for, contribute to
or otherwise maintain the employee's employment-related health insurance benefits, if any, at the
level and under the conditions coverage would have been provided if the employee had
continued working continuously for the duration of such leave.
of 4

SECTION 3. Said section 2 of said chapter 175M is hereby inserting the following
subsection:-
(k) Benefits shall not be paid to any individual for any week commencing during an
established and customary vacation period or holiday recess if such individual is employed with
the employer in the period immediately before such vacation period or holiday recess, and there
is a reasonable assurance that such individual will perform such services in the period
immediately following such vacation period or holiday recess.
SECTION 4. Section 6 of said chapter 175M is hereby amended by adding after
subsection (c) (2) the following subsection:-
(3) For a school district as defined in section 2 of chapter 70 or an education collaborative
as established under section 4E of chapter 40 the required employer’s portion of the contribution
for medical leave pursuant to (c) (1) and family leave pursuant to (c) (2) of this section shall be
paid for with income surtax revenue tax specified in subsection (d) of section 4 of chapter 62,
and remitted to the Family and Employment Security Trust Fund by the commonwealth.
of 4